Montana, session 2025, SB75.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Revision of termination date -- conflicting amendments -- no revival of terminated
amendment. (1) The termination date of a statute may be revised by amending the session law for the initial
legislation that provided for the termination date. There is no limit on the number of times that a termination
date may be revised pursuant to this section.
(2) In the event of conflicting revisions to a termination date during the same legislative session,
the conflict may be resolved through a coordination instruction. If the conflict is not resolved through a
coordination instruction, the revised termination date that falls latest chronologically becomes law and all earlier
revised termination dates from the same legislative session are void.
(3) A termination date is not revised through an amendment of session law unless the legislation
revising the termination date is effective before the later of the initial termination date or the amended
termination date.
(4) As long as the session law of the initial legislation that provided for the termination date is
amended in the same enactment, this section does not invalidate the amendment of a termination date when
the session law that previously revised the termination date of the initial legislation is also amended.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
1, chapter 2, part 2, and the provisions of Title 1, chapter 2, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 75
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 75
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 4. Retroactive applicability. [This act] applies retroactively, within the meaning of 1-2-109,
to all legislation passed and approved on or after commencement of the 69th legislative session.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 75
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 75, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 75
INTRODUCED BY S. VINTON
BY REQUEST OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
AN ACT REVISING STATUTORY CONSTRUCTION BY PROVIDING A PROCEDURE TO AMEND A
TERMINATION DATE; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A RETROACTIVE
APPLICABILITY DATE.”